North Carolina, session 2025, SB186.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Winston-Salem for the
purchase of a ladder truck for the fire department's Station 19.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S186-v-1*